Arkansas, session 2025, HB1049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-39-101(8), concerning the definitions for
offenses of burglary, trespass, and other intrusions, is amended to read as
follows:
(8) “Premises” means, except as provided in § 5-39-215, an
occupiable structure and any real property;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 39, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-39-215. Unlawful squatting.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Immediate family" means a person's spouse, children,
*LGL006*
02-18-2025 10:56:50 LGL006

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 S2/13/25 S2/18/25 HB1049
parents or guardian, siblings, and grandparents, whether related by blood,
adoption, or marriage;
(2) "Premises" means a dwelling, commercial building, or vacant
or unimproved real property; and
(3)(A) "Unlawful squatting" means entering and residing
unlawfully in a premises when the person entering and residing in the
premises is not privileged or licensed to do so.
(B) "Unlawful squatting" includes without limitation
taking up residence in a premises a person does not own if he or she:
(i) Is not a current tenant at the premises;
(ii) Does not have a valid agreement to occupy the
premises; and
(iii) Is not an immediate family member of the owner
of the premises.
(b) A person commits the offense of unlawful squatting if:
(1) The person:
(A) Knowingly enters upon the premises of another person;
(B) Knowingly resides on the premises of the other person
under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section for any period of time;
(C) Knowingly acts without lawful authority under
subdivisions (b)(1)(A) and (B) of this section; and
(D) Cannot produce at least one (1) of the following
documents:
(i) A deed or mortgage statement in his or her name
for the premises;
(ii) A lease agreement that includes the name and
signature of the other person or an authorized representative of the other
person;
(iii) A valid written or electronic agreement or
communication authorizing the person to enter upon the premises; or
(iv) A receipt or other reliable evidence of a rent
payment made to the other person or an authorized representative of the other
person dated within the last sixty (60) days;
(2) The premises the person enters upon is not open to the
public at the time of entry;
(3) The owner of the premises has directed the person entering
02-18-2025 10:56:50 LGL006

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 S2/13/25 S2/18/25 HB1049
upon the premises to leave the premises or has contacted law enforcement to
make a report of unlawful squatting; and
(4) No pending litigation exists between the owner of the
premises and the person entering upon the premises.
(c) A law enforcement agency shall not accept a report of unlawful
squatting unless the report is by an:
(1) Owner of the premises upon which the unlawful squatting
occurred; or
(2) Authorized representative of the owner of the premises upon
which the unlawful squatting occurred.
(d) A law enforcement officer acting in good faith in response to a
report of a violation of this section is immune from criminal and civil
liability.
(e)(1) Unlawful squatting is a Class B misdemeanor.
(2) A second offense of unlawful squatting is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(3) A third offense of unlawful squatting is a Class D felony.
(f) If a person who has entered upon the premises of another person
knowingly provides a false document in response to a request to produce a
document under subdivision (b)(1)(D) of this section or otherwise produces a
false document as justification for his or her presence on the premises, the
person is guilty upon conviction of a Class D felony.
(g) A person aggrieved by a violation of this section is granted a
private cause of action against the person who violated this section and is
entitled to recover damages, including without limitation restitution, and
reasonable attorney's fees.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-54-122(c)(1), concerning Class D felony
offenses of filing a false report, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(G) The false report alleges the offense of unlawful
squatting.
/s/Tosh



02-18-2025 10:56:50 LGL006